Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2130
Bonds; authority; powers.

In connection with the issuance of bonds or the incurring of obligations under leases and in order to secure the payment of such bonds or obligations, an authority, in addition to its other powers, shall have power: (1) To pledge all or any part of its gross or net rents, fees, or revenue to which its right then exists or may thereafter come into existence; (2) to mortgage all or any part of its real or personal property, then owned or thereafter acquired; (3) to covenant against pledging all or any part of its rents, fees, and revenue, or against mortgaging all or any part of its real or personal property, to which its right or title then exists or may thereafter come into existence, or against permitting or suffering any lien on such revenue or property; to covenant with respect to limitations on its right to sell, lease, or otherwise dispose of any redevelopment project, or any part thereof; and to covenant as to what other or additional debts or obligations may be incurred by it; (4) to covenant as to the bonds to be issued and as to the issuance of such bonds in escrow or otherwise, and as to the use and disposition of the proceeds thereof; to provide for the replacement of lost, destroyed, or mutilated bonds; to covenant against extending the time for the payment of its bonds or interest thereon; and to covenant for the redemption of the bonds and to provide the terms and conditions thereof; (5) to covenant, subject to the limitations contained in the Community Development Law, as to the amount of revenue to be raised each year or other period of time by rents, fees, and other revenue, and as to the use and disposition to be made thereof; to establish or to authorize the establishment of special funds for money held for operating costs, debt service, reserves, or other purposes, and to covenant as to the use and disposition of the money held in such funds; (6) to prescribe the procedure, if any, by which the terms of any contract with bondholders may be amended or abrogated, the amount of bonds the holders of which must consent thereto and the manner in which such consent may be given; (7) to covenant as to the use, maintenance, and replacement of any or all of its real or personal property, the insurance to be carried thereon, and the use and disposition of insurance money, and to warrant its title to such property; (8) to covenant as to the rights, liabilities, powers, and duties arising upon the breach by it of any covenants, conditions, or obligations; and to covenant and prescribe as to events of default and terms and conditions upon which any or all of its bonds or obligations shall become or may be declared due before maturity, and as to the terms and conditions upon which such declaration and its consequences may be waived; (9) to vest in any obligees of the authority the right to enforce the payment of the bonds or any covenants securing or relating to the bonds; to vest in any obligee or obligees holding a specified amount in bonds the right, in the event of a default by the authority, to take possession of and use, operate, and manage any redevelopment project or any part thereof, title to which is in the authority, or any funds connected therewith, and to collect the rents and revenue arising therefrom and to dispose of such money in accordance with the agreement of the authority with such obligees; to provide for the powers and duties of such obligees and to limit the liabilities thereof; and to provide the terms and conditions upon which such obligees may enforce any covenant or rights securing or relating to the bonds; (10) to pledge all of the revenue from any occupation tax received or to be received with respect to any enhanced employment area; and (11) to exercise all or any part or combination of the powers herein granted; to make such covenants, other than and in addition to the covenants herein expressly authorized, and to do any and all such acts and things as may be necessary or convenient or desirable in order to secure its bonds, or, in the absolute discretion of the authority, as will tend to make the bonds more marketable notwithstanding that such covenants, acts, or things may not be enumerated herein.

Laws 1951, c. 224, § 11(1), p. 813;

R.R.S.1943, § 14-1630;

R.R.S.1943, § 19-2630;

Laws 2007, LB562, § 7.